Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4793.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 309. Within Not later than 5 business days after certification of an election, each member-elect shall must be notified of the election. Within 10 business days after notification by the school district election coordinator of election or appointment to the board, each person shall file with the secretary of the board an acceptance of the office to which the person has been elected or appointed. The secretary of the board shall forward a copy of the acceptance to the school district election coordinator. Sec. 310. (1) Before entering upon the duties of his or her the office, an individual elected to the office of school board member shall take and subscribe to the oath provided in section 1 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963. (2) The office of a school board member becomes vacant immediately, regardless of declaration by an officer or acceptance by the school board or 1 or more of its the school board's members, upon any of the following events: (a) The death of the school board member. (b) The school board member's being member is adjudicated insane or being is found to be a legally incapacitated individual by a court. of competent jurisdiction. (c) The school board member's resignation. (d) The school board member's removal from office. (e) The school board member's conviction for a felony. (f) The school board member's election or appointment being is declared void by a competent tribunal. (g) The school board member's neglect or failure to file the acceptance of office, to take the oath of office , or to give or renew an official bond required by law. (h) The school board member ceasing to possess the legal qualifications for holding office. (i) The school board member moving his or her the school board member's residence from the school district. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law. (a) House Bill No. 4795 (request no. H02013'25 a). (b) House Bill No. 4794 (request no. H02013'25 b).